District of Columbia statutes.
50-1531

Establishment of a domestic tour bus program.

(a)

By December 30, 2009, the Mayor shall establish a new program to encourage domestic sightseeing tour bus operations, which shall include setting a yearly fee schedule for tour bus operators to encourage operators to register their vehicles in the District.

(b)

All funds raised from the fee schedule shall be transferred to the Department of Parks and Recreation for environmental recreation programs.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 6101, 57 DCR 181
Short title: Section 6100 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle K of title VI of the act may be cited as the “Tour Bus Act of 2009”.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6101 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 6101 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).